Louisiana, session 2026, SB506.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part 1 of Chapter 3-G of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 40:600.121 through 600.126, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 15-C. THE DREAM STARTER ACT
§600.121. Short Title; purpose
A. This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Dream Starter
Act."
B. The purpose of this Part is to create a targeted and accountable
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1495 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 506
program to expand access to first-generation homeownership.
§600.122. Legislative findings
A. The legislature finds as follows:
(1) Homeownership is a workforce issue and a family wealth issue.
(2) Expanding sustainable homeownership strengthens workforce
stability, local tax bases, and long-term household wealth.
(3) Residents without generational wealth or prior exposure to
homeownership face barriers not captured fully by income screening alone.
§600.123. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "First-time homebuyer" means an individual who has not held an
ownership interest in residential real property within the previous three years.
(2) "First-generation homebuyer"means a first-time homebuyer who has
not previously held sole ownership of residential real property and who meets
one or more additional criteria established by this Chapter or by rule consistent
with this Chapter.
(3) "Principal residence" means an owner-occupied residential dwelling,
including a single-family residence and other eligible owner-occupied residential
structures recognized by rule.
§600.124. Fund and administration
There is hereby established in the state treasury the First-Generation
Home Buyer Assistance Fund, administered by the Louisiana Housing
Corporation. Monies in the fund may consist of legislative appropriations,
federal funds, grants, gifts, donations, repayments, interest earnings, and other
lawful sources. The corporation may coordinate this program with existing state
and local homeownership programs and may partner with private lenders,
nonprofit organizations, and housing counselors.
§600.125. Assistance and eligibility
The program shall provide forgivable loans to eligible applicants for
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1495 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 506
down payment assistance, closing costs, mortgage insurance, interest-rate buy-
downs, and other allowable costs established by rule. Applicants shall complete
approved home buyer education and financial counseling and shall occupy the
property as a principal residence for the period and other applicants identified
in this Chapter.
§600.126. Accountability and Integrity
The corporation shall submit an annual report to the legislature on
participation, geographic distribution, loan performance, and program
outcomes. The corporation shall implement safeguards including income
verification, occupancy verification, and recapture provisions for
noncompliance.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.